District of Columbia statutes.
1-620.06

Training.

The Mayor shall provide for the establishment and supervision of programs, as may be necessary to comply with the provisions of this subchapter, for the education and training of employees in the recognition, avoidance, and prevention of unsafe and unhealthful working conditions and practices.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2006, 25 DCR 5740

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-621.6.
1973 Ed., § 1-350.6.